Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 6. Electrical Safety.

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

For plumbers and electricians, see 8 AAC 90.

Sec. 18.60.580.
Minimum electrical standards.

After the American National Standards Institute approves a new, published edition of the National Electrical Code or a new, published edition of the National Electrical Safety Code, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may, by regulation, adopt the most recent codes to constitute the minimum electrical safety standards of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 138 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For certificates of fitness required to perform work subject to this section, see AS

18.62.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 18.60.590.
Code amendments; local safety codes.

The department may by regulation adopt amendments to the National Electrical Code as approved and issued by the American National Standards Institute.

AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

do not affect the authority of any municipality or rural electrification association to prescribe by ordinance, rule, or order standards for their respective areas of jurisdiction not less stringent than the standards prescribed by the department or those established under AS

18.60.580

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969; am § 42 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 29 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 17 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1990; am § 26 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 18.60.600.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department may

adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

;

inspect the electrical wiring of any place of employment or public structure in this state.

The department shall

keep a record of all inspection fees collected;

keep a record of all electrical inspections conducted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 18.60.610.
Delegation of authority.

Upon application to the department, a person, corporation, electric utility firm, public utility district, rural electrification association, or municipal utility district furnishing electrical current may be authorized by the commissioner to inspect the electrical wiring for a public or commercial structure as defined in AS

18.60.660

to which it is to furnish electrical current before energizing the electrical system on, in, or about the premises. Authorization by the commissioner under this section constitutes a grant of full authority to act within the provisions of AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

with the same immunities and privileges accorded to the state in the performance of these duties.
A person or entity whose electrical wiring installation is found by the authorized inspector not to meet the standards prescribed has the right to appeal to the commissioner for a new inspection. The commissioner shall, within 15 days, furnish a new inspection by a designee not associated with the person, firm, or utility that did the original inspection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 18.60.620.
Inspection fees.

A person, corporation, electric utility firm, public utility district, rural electrification association, or municipal utility district authorized under AS

18.60.610

to provide inspection services may charge a fee for these services. After notice and hearing, the department shall set a schedule of maximum fees for inspection services rendered under AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

.
The department may review the schedule every two years after giving notice and hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Sec. 18.60.630.
Enforcement of compliance.

An authorized inspector under this chapter shall give written notice to the owner of constructed premises, or the contractor of premises under construction, of each violation of applicable electrical standards discovered as a result of inspection.
If within 15 days after receipt of written notice of an electrical violation, the person notified does not rectify the condition, the inspector shall notify the electric utility firm, public utility district, rural electrification association, or municipality district supplying power to the premises.
Upon notice in writing from the inspector, the supplier of electrical power may discontinue services to the premises where the alleged violation exists.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.60.640.
Scope of work covered.

AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

cover only new installations and alterations to existing installations.

These standards are the recommended minimum standards for all new structures in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A state employee who engages in installation of new electrical systems or performs alteration of existing systems must have a certificate of fitness, but a state employee who performs only routine maintenance and replacement of burned out or damaged items on state property need not have a certificate. September 23, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.650.
Penalty for violations.

A person who installs electrical wiring not in compliance with minimum electrical standards as set out in AS

18.60.580

, and who fails to correct this wiring after having been notified in writing by an authorized inspector, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.60.660.
Definitions.

In AS

18.60.580

—

18.60.660

,

“commissioner” means commissioner of labor and workforce development;

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“electrical wiring” means the entire electrical system, including all conducting and shielding material, all regulatory and safety apparatus, and all devices and techniques used in the process of installation;

“public structures” mean buildings such as hotels, resident housing with more than one rental unit, restaurants, taverns, lodging houses, children’s homes, auditoriums, town halls, or any structure designed or used for public assembly whether publicly or privately financed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For electrical safety code, see 8 AAC 70.